pl: Obsługiwane wskaźniki: Procentowa ilość tkanki tłuszczowej; Zawartość procentowa wody w organizmie; Ciężar właściwy kości; Masa mięśniowa; Inne
cs: Podporovaná metrika: Procento tělesného tuku; Procento tělesné vody; Kostní hmota; Svalová hmota; Jiné
ro-RO: Măsurători acceptate: Procentul de grăsime corporală; Procentul de apă corporală; Masa osoasă; Masa musculară; Altele
da: Målinger understøttet: Kropsfedtprocent; Kropsvandprocent; Knoglemasse; Muskelmasse; Andet
pt-PT: Métricas suportadas: Percentagem de gordura corporal; Percentagem de água corporal; Massa óssea; Massa muscular; Outro
pt-BR: Métricas com suporte: Porcentagem de gordura corporal; Porcentagem de água corporal; Massa óssea; Massa muscular; Outro
tr: Desteklenen Metrikler: Vücut yağ yüzdesi; Vücut su yüzdesi; Kemik kütlesi; Kas kütlesi; Diğer
sk-SK: Podporované metriky: Percento telesného tuku; Percento vody v tele; Kostná hmota; Svalová hmota; Iné
ru: Поддерживаемые показатели: Процент жира в организме; Процент воды в организме; Костная масса; Мышечная масса; Другое
zh-TW: 支援的指標: 體脂肪率; 體水份率; 骨質; 肌肉量; 其他
ja: 対応する測定項目: 体脂肪率; 体内水分率; 骨量; 筋肉量; その他
lt-LT: Palaikoma metrika: Kūno riebalų procentinė dalis; Kūno vandens procentinė dalis; Kaulų masė; Raumenų masė; Kita
ko: 지원되는 측정항목: 체지방률; 체수분율; 골량; 근육량; 기타
it: Metriche supportate: Percentuale di grasso corporeo; Percentuale di acqua corporea; Massa ossea; Massa muscolare; Altro
bg-BG: Поддържани показатели: Процент на телесните мазнини; Процент вода в тялото; Костна маса; Мускулна маса; Други
sv: Mätvärden som stöds: Kroppsfettprocent; Kroppsvattenprocent; Benmassa; Muskelmassa; Övrigt
el: Υποστηριζόμενες μετρήσεις: Ποσοστό σωματικού λίπους; Ποσοστό νερού σώματος; Οστική μάζα; Μυϊκή μάζα; Άλλο
hu: Támogatott mérőszámok: Testzsírszázalék; Testvízszázalék; Csonttömeg; Izomtömeg; Egyéb
sl-SI: Podprte meritve: Odstotek telesne maščobe; Odstotek vode v telesu; Kostna masa; Mišična masa; Drugo
hr-HR: Podržana metrika: Postotak tjelesne masti; Postotak vode u tijelu; Koštana masa; Mišićna masa; Ostalo
th: รองรับเมตริก: เปอร์เซ็นต์ไขมันในร่างกาย; เปอร์เซ็นต์น้ำในร่างกาย; มวลกระดูก; มวลกล้ามเนื้อ; อื่นๆ
en: Metrics supported: Body fat percentage; Body water percentage; Bone mass; Muscle mass; Other
es: Métricas compatibles: Porcentaje de grasa corporal; Porcentaje de agua corporal; Masa ósea; Masa muscular; Otros
fi: Tuetut mittarit: Kehon rasvaprosentti; Kehon vesiprosentti; Luumassa; Lihasmassa; Muu
nl: Ondersteunde statistieken: Percentage lichaamsvet; Percentage lichaamsvocht; Botmassa; Spiermassa; Andere
nb: Støttede målinger: Kroppsfettprosent; Kroppsvannprosent; Beinmasse; Muskelmasse; Annet
zh-CN: 支持的指标: 体脂率; 身体水分率; 骨量; 肌肉质量; 其他
de: Unterstützte Metriken: Körperfettanteil; Körperflüssigkeitsanteil; Knochenmasse; Muskelmasse; Sonstiges
fr: Métriques prises en charge: Pourcentage de graisse corporelle; Pourcentage d’eau corporelle; Masse osseuse; Masse musculaire; Autre
vi: Chỉ số được hỗ trợ: Tỷ lệ phần trăm mỡ trong cơ thể; Tỷ lệ phần trăm nước trong cơ thể; Khối lượng xương; Khối lượng cơ; Khác